Utah statutes.
53B-2-103.   Boards of trustees -- Powers and duties.

(1)  Each college and university has a board of trustees which may act in behalf of its institution in performing duties, responsibilities, and functions as may be specifically authorized to the board of trustees by the State Board of Regents.

(2)  A board of trustees has the following powers and duties:

(a)  facilitates communication between the institution and the community;

(b)  assists in planning, implementing, and executing fund raising and development projects aimed at supplementing institutional appropriations;

(c)  perpetuates and strengthens alumni and community identification with the institution's tradition and goals; and

(d)  selects recipients of honorary degrees.

